Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2225.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 58-25,111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
58-25,111. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), when
prevented by an act of God, the failure of public utility services or other
conditions beyond the landlord's control, the landlord shall:
(1) Comply with the requirements of all applicable city, county and
state codes materially affecting health and safety which are primarily
imposed upon the landlord. If the duty imposed by this paragraph is
greater than any duty imposed by any other paragraph of this subsection,
the landlord's duty shall be determined in accordance with the provisions
of this paragraph.;
(2) make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the
mobile home space in a fit and habitable condition.;
(3) keep all common areas of the mobile home park in a clean and
safe condition.;
(4) maintain in good and safe working order and condition all
facilities supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord.;
(5) provide for removal of garbage, rubbish, and other waste from the
mobile home park.; and
(6) furnish outlets for electric, water and sewer services and provide
to such outlets an adequate, safe and sanitary supply of such services.
(b) A landlord shall not impose any conditions of rental or occupancy
which that restrict the tenant in the choice of, or from access to, a seller or
provider of fuel, furnishings, goods, services, including cable television,
communications, broadband and telecommunications services, or mobile
homes connected with the rental or occupancy of a mobile home space
unless such condition is reasonably necessary to protect the health, safety
or welfare of mobile home tenants in the park. The landlord may impose
reasonable requirements designed to standardize methods of utility
connection and hookup. If any such conditions are imposed which that

HB 2225 2
result in charges for such goods or services, the charges shall not exceed
the actual cost incurred in providing the tenant with such goods or
services.
(c) The landlord and tenant may agree in writing that the tenant is to
perform the landlord's duties specified in subsection (a)(5) and (6) and also
specified repairs, maintenance tasks, alterations or remodeling, but only if
the transaction is entered into in good faith and not for the purpose of
evading the obligations of the landlord.
(d) The landlord and tenant may agree that the tenant is to perform
specified repairs, maintenance tasks, alterations or remodeling only if:
(1) The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith, and not
to evade the obligations of the landlord, and is. Such agreement shall be
set forth in a separate written agreement signed by the parties and
supported by adequate consideration;
(2) the work is not necessary to cure noncompliance with subsection
(a)(1); and
(3) the agreement does not diminish or affect the obligation of the
landlord to other tenants.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 58-25,111 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.